Hawaii statutes.
§437D-16 Application of insurance laws. None of
the provisions of this chapter shall apply to the issuance of collision
insurance underwritten by an insurer authorized to transact property and
casualty business in this State; provided that the insurer is not a lessor as
defined in this chapter or a limited line motor vehicle rental company producer
as defined in [section] 431:9A-141. [L 1988, c 251, pt of §2; am
L 2002, c 235, §3]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next